Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 4 Soil Conservation

2-4-1.
Legislative determinations and declaration of policy.

In recognition of the ever increasing environmental problems resulting from demands on the land and renewable resources of the state and of the need to preserve, protect and develop these resources of the state at a rate and level of quality to meet the
needs of the people of the state, and the need for environmental balance, it is hereby declared to be the policy of the state to provide for the conservation of the land and renewable natural resources using those measures that best
meet these objectives, including, but not limited to, the control and prevention of erosion, control of floods, the conservation and development of water resources and the improvement of water quality; assistance in the conservation
of coastal land and water resources, the prevention of impairment of dams and reservoirs by sediment, the protection of wildlife, and preservation of natural beauty, and to protect and promote the health, safety and general welfare
of the people of this state. It is further the policy of the general assembly to authorize conservation districts established under this chapter to serve as a local unit of the state conservation committee responsible for the conservation
of the renewable natural resources of this state, and competent to administer, in close cooperation with landowners and occupiers, with local governmental units, and with agencies of the government of this state and of the United States,
projects, programs and activities suitable for carrying out the policy of this chapter.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-4-1

; P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 179, § 1.

2-4-2.
Definitions.

“Associate Director” means a designated representative of any community who serves to advise and consult with the board of directors of a district.

“Committee” or “state conservation committee” means the agency created in §

2-4-3

. All references in this chapter to “state conservation committee”, “state committee”, or “committee” shall be deemed to be references to “state conservation committee”.

“Conservation” includes conservation, improvement, maintenance, preservation, protection and use, and the control and prevention of floodwater and sediment damages, and the safe disposal of water.

“Director” means one of the members of the governing body of a district, appointed or elected in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

“District” or “conservation district” means a subdivision of the state conservation committee, and a quasi public corporation organized in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, for the purposes, with the powers, and subject to the restrictions
set forth. All districts created under this chapter shall be known as conservation districts and shall have all the powers and duties set out in this chapter. All references in this chapter to “districts” shall be deemed to be
references to “conservation districts”.

“Land occupier” or “occupier of land” includes any person, firm or corporation holding title to, or in possession of, any lands lying within a district organized under the provisions of this chapter, whether as owner, renter, lessee, tenant, town, municipality
or otherwise.

“Renewable natural resources”, “natural resources”, or “resources” includes land, soil, water, vegetation, trees, fish, wildlife, streams, rivers, natural beauty, scenery, and open space.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-4-2

; P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 163, § 1.

2-4-3.
State conservation committee.

There is established, within the department of environmental management to serve as an agency of the state and to perform the functions conferred upon it by this chapter, the state conservation committee. The following shall serve as members of the committee:
the director of the department of environmental management, or his or her designee, and four (4) members of the public appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. At least one member shall be appointed
from each of the state’s conservation districts and, in making appointments under this section, the governor shall give due consideration to recommendations made by the state’s conservation district directors.

Members of the committee as of the effective date of this act [April 20, 2006] shall continue to serve for the balance of their current terms. Thereafter, members shall be appointed to terms of three (3) years. Members shall hold office until a successor
has been selected. Vacancies shall be filled for any unexpired terms. The selection of successors to fill an unexpired term or for a full term shall be in the same manner in which the respective state committee member had been
selected.

[Deleted by P.L. 2006, ch. 22, § 1 and P.L. 2006, ch. 27, § 1].

Gubernatorial appointments made under this section after the effective date of this act [April 20, 2006] shall be subject to the advice and consent of the senate. All persons appointed to the committee after the effective date of this act [April 20, 2006]
shall be residents of the state.

The committee shall invite the director of the cooperative extension service and agricultural experiment station, chief of the office of state planning, director of transportation, the president of the Rhode Island association of conservation districts,
the state conservationist of the USDA soil conservation service, the state executive director of the USDA agricultural stabilization and conservation service, the chairperson of the water resources board, and the executive director
of the coastal resources management council, and any other agency representatives necessary to carry out the intent of this chapter to serve as advisors to the state committee.

The committee shall keep a record of its official actions, and may perform any acts, hold any public hearings, and promulgate any rules and regulations that may be necessary for the execution of its functions under this chapter.

The director of the department of environmental management shall direct staff to support the committee within the constraints of available resources.

History of Section.
P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 105, § 13; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 22, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 27, § 1.

2-4-3.1.
Rhode Island farm, forest and open space land value subcommittee.

There is hereby authorized, created and established the “Rhode Island Farm, Forest, and Open Space Land Value Subcommittee” (the subcommittee) to recommend the methodology and values for the assessment of land for property taxation on the basis of current
use for farm, forest, and open space lands, as established by chapter 27 of title 44 and §

44-5-12

. The values recommended by the subcommittee, upon review and approval by the state conservation committee, shall be made available to local tax assessors and such value shall be the recommended maximum current use
value per acre at which such land classifications can be assessed.

The subcommittee shall consist of the following twelve (12) members: the chair of the state conservation committee, or designee; three (3) local tax assessors appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate; the director of the department
of administration, or designee, who shall be a subordinate within the department of administration; the chief of the department of environmental management’s division of agriculture, or designee, who shall be a subordinate within
the division who shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member; the chief of the department of environmental management’s division of forest environment, or designee, who shall be a subordinate within the division who shall serve
as a nonvoting ex officio member; the dean of the University of Rhode Island’s College of Natural Resources, or designee, who shall be a subordinate within the college who shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member; the executive
director of the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns, or his or her designee, who shall serve as a nonvoting member of the subcommittee; the chairperson of the Rhode Island Agricultural Council, or his or her designee, who shall
serve as a nonvoting member of the subcommittee; and two (2) public members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, one of whom shall be a landowner currently enrolled under the forest land provision
of chapter 27 of title 44, one of whom shall be a member of a land trust. Each appointed member of the subcommittee shall serve for a term of three (3) years, and shall serve until his or her successor has been appointed and qualified.
Any vacancy which may occur in the subcommittee of the members appointed by the governor shall be filled by the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the predecessor as prescribed in this section.
The members of the subcommittee shall be eligible to succeed themselves. No one shall be eligible for appointment unless he or she is a resident of this state. Those members of the subcommittee as of the effective date of this
act [April 20, 2006] who were appointed by the speaker of the house and the president of the senate shall cease to be members of the subcommittee on the effective date of this act [April 20, 2006], and the governor shall thereupon
appoint four (4) members as prescribed in this section, each of whom shall serve for the balance of the unexpired term of his or her predecessor.

The state conservation committee shall provide the subcommittee’s list of current use values for farm, forest, and open space land to each tax assessor, through the department of administration, on or before February 15 of each year in which the subcommittee
is required to determine such figures.

The subcommittee shall abide by the rules governing the state conservation committee, as provided in §

2-4-5

. Five (5) voting members of the subcommittee shall constitute a quorum. A majority vote of those present shall be required for action.

The subcommittee shall meet at the call of the chair. All meetings shall be held consistent with chapter 46 of title 42.

The subcommittee shall conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified members and new designees of ex officio members within six (6) months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the chair of the subcommittee,
approved by the subcommittee and conducted by the chair of the subcommittee. The subcommittee may approve the use of any subcommittee or staff members or other individuals to assist with training. The training course shall include
instruction in the following areas: chapters 44-27, 44-5, 2-4, 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2; and the subcommittee’s rules. The director of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act
[April 20, 2006], prepare and disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapters 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2.

History of Section.
P.L. 1999, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 22, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 27, § 1.

2-4-4.
Agents and employees — Assistance by other agencies — Delegation of powers.

The committee may employ an administrative officer and any technical experts and any other agents, and employees, permanent and temporary, that it may require, and shall determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. It has the authority to
delegate to its chairperson, to one or more of its members, or to one or more agents or employees, any powers and duties that it may deem proper. Upon request of the committee, for the purpose of carrying out any of its functions,
the supervising officer of any state agency, or of any state institution of learning shall, insofar as may be possible under available appropriations, and having due regard to the needs of the agency to which the request is directed,
assign or detail to the committee members of the staff or personnel of the agency or institution of learning, and make any special reports, surveys, or studies that the committee may request. The committee may call upon the attorney
general for any legal services it may require.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-4-4

; P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 179, § 1.

2-4-5.
Chairperson of the committee — Quorum — Expenses — Surety bonds — Records — Audit.

The chairperson of the state committee shall be elected annually by the committee. The committee may elect from among its members such other officers as they deem necessary. A majority of the committee constitutes a quorum, and all actions of the committee
shall be by a majority vote of the members present and voting at a meeting at which a quorum is present. The chairperson and members of the committee receive no compensation for their services on the committee, but are entitled to
expenses or per diem, including traveling expenses, necessarily incurred in the discharge of their duties on the committee. The committee shall provide for the execution of surety bonds for all employees entrusted with funds or property;
shall provide for the keeping of a full and accurate record of all proceedings and of all resolutions, regulations, and orders issued or adopted; and shall provide for a periodic audit of the accounts of receipts and disbursements.
Members of the committee and the subcommittee shall be removable by the governor pursuant to §

36-1-7

of the general laws and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-4-5

; P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 22, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 27, § 1.

2-4-6.
Powers and duties of committee.

In addition to the duties and powers conferred upon the committee, it has the following duties and powers:

To offer any assistance as may be appropriate to the directors of conservation districts, organized as provided in this chapter, in the carrying out of any of their powers and programs; to assist and guide districts in the preparation and carrying out
of programs for resources conservation authorized under this chapter; to review district programs; to coordinate the programs of the conservation districts and resolve any conflicts in those programs.

To keep the directors of each of the conservation districts organized under this chapter informed of the activities and experience of all other districts organized under this chapter, and to facilitate an interchange of advice and experience between the
districts and cooperation between them.

To approve forms of agreements, proposed to be entered into by districts, with other districts or with any state, federal, interstate, or other public or private agency, organization, or individual, and advise the districts concerning the forms of agreements.

To secure the cooperation and assistance of the United States and any of its agencies, and of agencies of this state, in the work of the districts.

To enlist the cooperation and collaboration of state, federal, regional, interstate and local public and private agencies with the conservation districts; and to facilitate arrangements under which the conservation districts may serve city or town governing
bodies and other agencies as their local operating agencies in the administration of any activity concerned with the conservation of renewable natural resources.

To disseminate information throughout the state concerning the activities and programs of the conservation districts organized under this chapter, to make available information concerning the needs and the work of the conservation districts and the committee
to the governor, the legislature, executive agencies of the government of this state, political subdivisions of this state, cooperating federal agencies, and the general public.

Pursuant to procedures developed mutually by the committee and other federal, state and local agencies that are authorized to plan or administer activities significantly affecting the conservation of renewable natural resources, to receive from those
agencies for review and comment suitable descriptions of their plans, programs and activities for the purposes of coordination with district conservation programs; to arrange for and participate in conferences necessary to avoid
conflict among those plans and programs, to call attention to omissions, and to avoid duplications of effort.

Whenever the committee determines that there exists a substantial conflict between the resources conservation program of a district and the proposed plans or activities directly affecting resource conservation prepared by any other local governmental
unit or agency of the federal government, or this state, and that the conflict cannot be resolved through the consultation procedures provided for in this section, the committee shall submit a report of the conflict through the
department of environmental management to the governor.

To compile information and make studies, summaries, and analyses of natural resource conditions in cooperation with local conservation districts and conservation programs on a statewide basis.

Except as otherwise assigned by state law, to carry out and coordinate the policies of this state in programs at the state level for the conservation of the renewable natural resources of this state and to represent the state in matters affecting those
resources. This includes the formulation and development of state guidelines, as deemed necessary, for the conservation of soil, water and related natural resources of the state. When developing these guidelines the committee,
working with the conservation districts, may secure the assistance of state and federal agencies and Rhode Island schools of higher learning to make such investigations and studies as are necessary.

To offer technical assistance to the department of environmental management and/or other state agencies in the development of recommendations for the general assembly of any natural resource legislation deemed necessary for the conservation, preservation,
protection and development of the renewable natural resources of this state. This legislation may include, but is not necessarily limited to, provision for erosion and sediment control, flood plain regulation and the conservation
of watershed resources.

To assist conservation districts in obtaining legal services from the attorney general.

To require annual reports from conservation districts, the form and content of which shall be developed by the committee.

To establish by regulations, with the assistance and advice of the appropriate state fiscal officers, adequate and reasonably uniform accounting and auditing procedures which shall be used by conservation districts, and when the situation requires on
a vote of at least four (4) members, to impound all district funds and assets subject to ratification at a hearing on the action in accordance with the administrative procedures act, chapter 35 of title 42.

To approve and issue within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year a detailed annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state of its activities for the preceding
year. The report shall provide a review and synopsis of the state conservation district activities; an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, including meeting minutes, subjects addressed, decisions rendered,
studies conducted, policies and plans developed, approved, or modified, and programs administered or initiated; a summary of the work of the farm, forest and open space subcommittee including the list of current values for farm,
forest and open space; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and expended including the source of the funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, and a summary of any clerical, administrative or technical
support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a synopsis of any legal matters related to the authority of the council; a summary of any training
courses held pursuant to subsection

2-4-6(18)

; a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year; and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be posted electronically as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of this provision.

To establish by regulation the procedure for removing a district director from office either for excessive absence or for other cause. The procedure shall include a hearing before the committee at which time the affected director may seek to rebut the
charges.

To have supervision and control of any funds appropriated by the general assembly to finance the activities of the committee and the conservation districts; to administer the provisions of any act enacted by the legislature appropriating funds for expenditure
in connection with the activities of conservation districts; to distribute to conservation districts funds, equipment, supplies and services received by the committee for that purpose from any source, subject to the conditions
that shall be made applicable thereto in any state or federal statute or local ordinance making available those funds, property or services; to issue regulations establishing suitable controls to govern the use by conservation
districts of those funds, property and services; approve all budgets, administrative procedures and operations of those districts to ensure that districts conform with applicable laws and regulations.

To conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified members and new designees of ex officio members within six (6) months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the chair of the committee, approved by the committee,
and conducted by the chair of the committee. The committee may approve the use of any committee or staff members or other individuals to assist with training. The course shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions
of chapters 2-4, 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2; and the committee’s rules and regulations. The director of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act [April 20, 2006], prepare and disseminate training
materials relating to the provisions of chapters 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-4-6

; P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 353, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 22, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 27, § 1.

2-4-7.
Establishment of conservation districts.

There are established, three (3) conservation districts as follows:

All that portion known as Washington County and Kent County is incorporated into a district to be called the southern Rhode Island conservation district;

All that portion known as Providence County is incorporated into a district to be called the northern Rhode Island conservation district;

All that portion known as Newport County and Bristol County is incorporated into a district to be called the eastern Rhode Island conservation district.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-4-7

; P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 68, § 1.

2-4-8.
District board — Organization — Quorum — Expenses and audit.

The governing body of the districts is be the board of directors consisting of five (5) directors, elected or appointed. The directors shall elect one of their members to be chairperson and may, from time to time, change that designation. The term of
office of each director is three (3) years. A director holds office until a successor has been elected or appointed and has qualified. Vacancies shall be filled for any unexpired term. The selection of successors to fill an unexpired
term, or for a full term, shall be made in the same manner in which the retiring directors were, respectively, selected. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum and all actions of the board shall be by a majority vote of the
members present and voting at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

The directors may employ a secretary and other employees, technical experts, personnel, permanent and temporary, as they may require and shall determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. The directors shall provide for the execution of surety
bonds for all employees and officers who are entrusted with funds or property; shall provide for the keeping of a record of all proceedings and orders issued or adopted; and shall provide for a periodic audit of the accounts of
receipts and disbursements in accordance with procedures prescribed by regulations of the state committee.

The directors may call upon the state committee for any legal services that may be available from the attorney general. The directors shall furnish to the state committee, upon request, copies of any rules, regulations, orders, contracts, ordinances,
forms and other documents that they shall adopt or employ, and any other information that may be required in the performance of their duties.

Directors shall receive twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per meeting for their services, and are entitled to other expenses at a rate set by the state committee, including per diem and traveling expenses, necessarily incurred in the discharge of their duties.
All payments for compensation and expenses are contingent upon availability of funds and at no time shall meeting or travel expenses supersede necessary conservation expenditures.

History of Section.
P.L. 1985, ch. 179, § 3.

2-4-9.
Designation of district directors — Appointments — Elections.

Three (3) directors will be appointed by the state conservation committee and shall be persons who are by training and experience qualified to perform the services which will be required of them in the performance of their duties. In appointing directors,
the state committee shall take into consideration the recommendations of the representative of the state committee from the area in which the district is located, as well as representation of the various interests of the district
such as agricultural, woodland, wildlife, recreation, community and conservation groups.

The committee shall receive nomination petitions for directors, whose terms have expired, by or before January 15 of the year following their expiration and shall take action to approve or reject the nominees within thirty (30) days of receipt. The committee
has the authority to extend the time within which nominating petitions may be filed.

No nomination petition shall be accepted by the committee unless it is subscribed to by twenty-five (25) or more occupiers of lands lying within the boundaries of the district. Land occupiers may sign more than one nominating petition to nominate more
than one candidate for director.

The conservation districts shall give notice and hold elections for the two (2) directors for each district on or before January 15 of the year following the expiration of these elected directors’ terms. All occupiers of lands lying within the district
shall be eligible to vote in the election. The two (2) candidates who shall receive the largest number, respectively, of the votes cast in the election shall be the elected directors for the district.

All elections of directors shall be supervised and conducted by the district directors of the districts involved. The elections shall be held during a period prescribed or approved by the state conservation committee and in that manner and under any rules
and regulations that the state committee prescribes. The cost of conducting elections shall be borne by the district involved. The board of directors shall certify to the state committee the names of the elected directors. The
state committee shall issue certificates of election to each certified director, and shall publish the results of the election in some newspaper of general circulation in the area.

The board of directors may appoint associate directors, as deemed necessary, to advise and consult with the board and to broaden representation from the communities within the district.

History of Section.
P.L. 1985, ch. 179, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 163, § 1.

2-4-10.
Repealed.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-4-10

; P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1985, ch. 179, § 2, effective June 18, 1985.

2-4-11.
Consultation with municipal representatives.

The directors may invite the legislative body of any municipality within the district to designate a representative to serve as an associate director to advise and consult with them on all questions of programs and policy which may affect the property,
water supply or other interest of the municipality. The board of directors may appoint, as they deem necessary, advisory committees to assure the availability of appropriate channels of communications to the board of directors, to
persons affected by district operations, and to local, federal, state, regional and interstate special-purpose districts and agencies responsible for community planning, conservation commissions, zoning or resource development activities.
The district shall keep the advisory committees informed of its work, and the advisory committees shall submit recommendations from time to time to the board of directors.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-4-11

; P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 163, § 1.

2-4-12.
Powers of districts and directors.

A conservation district organized under the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a subdivision of the state conservation committee, a quasi-public corporation exercising public powers, and the district, and directors of the conservation district,
shall have the following powers, in addition to other(s) granted in sections of this chapter:

To conduct surveys, investigations and research relating to the conservation of renewable natural resources and preventive and control measures and the works of improvement needed, and to publish the results of those surveys, investigations, or research
and to disseminate information concerning those preventive and control measures. In order to avoid duplication of research activities, no district shall initiate any research program except in cooperation with the government of
this state or any of its agencies, or with the United States or any of its agencies;

To develop necessary guidelines deemed necessary for the conservation of renewable natural resources of the district. In cooperation with the state committee, develop and formulate statewide guidelines deemed necessary for the conservation of the renewable
natural resources of the state; encourage local government to implement those guidelines in the planning and development of renewable natural resources under their jurisdiction; and offer any available technical and other assistance
necessary to local government for this purpose.

To conduct educational and demonstrational projects within the district on lands owned or controlled by this state or any of its agencies, with the cooperation of the agency administering and having jurisdiction of these lands, and of any other lands
within the district upon obtaining the consent of the occupier of the lands or the necessary rights or interests in the lands, in order to demonstrate by example the means, methods, measures and works of improvement by which the
conservation of renewable natural resources may be carried out;

To carry out preventive and control measures and works of improvement for the conservation of renewable natural resources within the district on lands owned or controlled by this state or any of its agencies, with the cooperation of the agency administering
and having jurisdiction of these lands, and on any other lands within the district upon obtaining the consent of the occupier of the lands or the necessary rights or interests in the lands;

To cooperate, or enter into agreements with, and within the limits of appropriations made available to it by law, to furnish financial or other aid to any agency, governmental or otherwise, or any occupier of lands within the district, in carrying on
of preventive and control measures and works of improvement for the conservation of renewable natural resources within the district, subject to any conditions that the directors may deem necessary to advance the purposes of this
chapter;

To obtain options upon and to acquire, by purchase, exchange, lease, gift, bequest, grant, or devise, any property, real or personal or rights or interests to maintain, administer, and improve any properties acquired, to receive income from those properties
and to expend income from those properties in carrying out the purposes and provisions of this chapter; and to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any of its property or interests in furtherance of the purposes and the provisions
of this chapter;

To make available, on any terms it shall prescribe, to land occupiers, cities or towns, municipalities or the state within the district, machinery, equipment, materials and any other services that will assist those land occupiers, cities or towns, municipalities,
or the state to carry on operations upon their lands for the conservation of renewable natural resources;

To construct, improve, repair, operate and maintain any structures or other works of improvement that may be necessary or convenient for the performance of any of the operations or activities authorized in this chapter;

To prepare and keep current a long-range program for the conservation of all of the renewable natural resources of the district. The program is directed toward the conservation of resources for their best uses and in a manner that will best meet the needs
of the district and the state, taking into consideration, where appropriate, such uses as farming, grazing, timber supply, forest, parks, outdoor recreation, water supplies for urban and rural areas; water for agricultural and
industrial uses, watershed protection, control of soil erosion, retardation of water runoff, flood prevention and control, protection of open space and scenery, preservation of natural beauty, protection of fish and wildlife, the
prevention or reduction of sedimentation and other pollution in rivers, streams, reservoirs, and the protection of groundwaters, and the location of urban facilities and structures that will fit the needs of the state and be consistent
with the best uses of the renewable natural resources of the state. The program includes an inventory of all renewable natural resources in the district, a compilation of current resource needs, projections of future resource requirements,
priorities for various resource activities, projected timetables, descriptions of available alternatives, and provisions for coordination with other resource programs; to prepare an annual work plan, which shall describe the action
programs, services, facilities, materials, working arrangements and estimated funds needed to carry out the parts of the long-range program that are of the highest priorities. Each district shall submit to the state committee a
copy of its long-range program and annual work plans for review and comment;

To acquire, by purchase, lease, or otherwise any property, real or personal, and to administer any project or program concerning the conservation of renewable natural resources located within its boundaries undertaken by federal, state, or other public
agency; to manage as agent of the federal, state or other public agency any project or program concerned with the conservation of renewable natural resources located within its boundaries; to act as agent of the federal, state,
or other public agency in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation, or administration of any program or project concerning the conservation of renewable natural resources within its boundaries;

To accept donations, gifts, and contributions in money, services, materials, or otherwise, from the United States or any of its agencies, from this state or any of its agencies, or from any other source, and to use or expend those moneys, services, materials
or other contributions in carrying out the purposes of this chapter; and

To have perpetual succession unless terminated or hereinafter provided; to make and execute contracts and other instruments, necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers; to make, and from time to time amend and repeal, regulations and rules
not inconsistent with this chapter; to carry into effect its purposes and powers.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-4-12

; P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 179, § 1.

2-4-13.
Contributions and agreements as conditions to benefits.

As a condition to the extending of any benefits under this chapter to, or the performance of work upon, any lands not owned or controlled by this state or any of its agencies, the directors may require contributions in money, services, materials, or otherwise
to any operations conferring those benefits, and may require land occupiers to enter into and perform any agreements as to the use of their lands as may be consistent with the purposes of this chapter; however, required contributions
must be approved as to amount and content by the state conservation committee.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-4-13

; P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 179, § 1.

2-4-14.
Public property laws inapplicable.

No provisions with respect to the acquisition, operation, or disposition of property by other public bodies are applicable to a district organized under the provisions of this chapter unless the legislature shall specifically so state.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-4-14

; P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 179, § 1.

2-4-15.
Cooperation between districts.

Any two (2) or more districts may engage in joint activities by agreement between or among them in planning, financing, constructing, operating, maintaining and administering any program or project concerning the conservation of renewable natural resources.
The districts concerned may make available for purposes of the agreement any funds, property, personnel, equipment or services available to them under this chapter.

Any district may, with the concurrence of the state committee, enter into agreements with a district, districts or responsible agency in adjoining states to carry out those purposes if the law in those states permits the district and agencies in those
states to enter into agreements. The committee has the authority to propose, guide and facilitate the establishment and carrying out of any agreements.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-4-15

; P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 179, § 1.

2-4-16.
Cooperation of other public agencies.

Agencies of this state and agencies of towns, municipalities or other governmental subdivisions of this state having jurisdiction over public or private land, or charged with the administration of publicly owned lands lying within the boundaries of any
district, may cooperate to the fullest extent with those districts in the implementation of programs undertaken by the directors under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-4-16

; P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 179, § 1.

2-4-17.
Repealed.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-4-17

; P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1985, ch. 179, § 2, effective June 18, 1985.